Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1201
Lien on crops; authorized.

Any person, including any public power district, cooperative, firm, or corporation, who contracts or agrees to furnish (1) seed to be sown or planted or (2) electrical power or energy, or both, used in the production of crops shall have a lien upon all crops produced from the seed furnished or produced with the electrical power or energy furnished to secure the payment of the purchase price of the seed or the cost of the electrical power or energy used.

Laws 1985, LB 503, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 54, § 18.